South Dakota, session 2026, HB1105.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA:
Section 1. That § 11-5-3 be AMENDED:
11-5-3. After the execution, recording, and filing of any declaration or contract
executed contract or declaration pursuant to §§ 11-5-1 and 11-5-2, the terms and
conditions of the same contract or declaration may be enforced by an action at law or by
a suit in equity brought by any:
(1) Any person possessing any interest in the land affected by such declaration or
contract or in any part of such land, or such action or suit may be maintained by
the affected real property; or
(2) The first or second class municipality within which such land the property is
situated.
A contract or declaration in violation of section 2 of this Act is not enforceable.
Section 2. That a NEW SECTION be added to chapter 11-5:
Notwithstanding the provisions of § 11-5-1, an owner of real property zoned for
commercial or residential use may not impose, by contract or declaration as set forth in
§ 11-5-2, any regulation or restriction that prohibits use of the real property for a
healthcare service, if the real property is located in a medically underserved area, a
medically underserved community, or a county with a medically underserved population,
as designated by the Department of Health in accordance with the Public Health Service
Act, 42 U.S.C. ch. 6A (January 1, 2026).
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.

26.282.27 2 1105
For purposes of this section, "healthcare service" means any service provided by
an accredited, certified, or licensed facility or practitioner for the purpose of curing,
diagnosing, preventing, relieving, or treating any health-related condition, disease,
emergency, illness, or injury.
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.